Hawaii statutes.
§490:9-332 Transfer of money; transfer of
funds from deposit account. (a) A transferee of money takes the money
free of a security interest unless the transferee acts in collusion with the
debtor in violating the rights of the secured party.

(b) A transferee of funds from a deposit
account takes the funds free of a security interest in the deposit account
unless the transferee acts in collusion with the debtor in violating the rights
of the secured party. [L 2000, c 241, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next